Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202585-2614
Eligible disabled person; qualifying child; tuition waiver; eligibility criteria.

In order for an eligible disabled person or such person's qualifying child to be eligible to receive a tuition waiver under the First Responder Recruitment and Retention Act, the eligible disabled person must meet the following criteria:

(1) If the eligible disabled person was a law enforcement officer, such person possessed, at the time of becoming disabled, a law enforcement officer certificate under sections 81-1401 to 81-1414.19. This subdivision shall not be satisfied if the Nebraska Police Standards Advisory Council has revoked or suspended such certificate or limited certificate under subdivision (6) of section 81-1403 and the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice has reviewed and approved such revocation or suspension;

(2) If the eligible disabled person was a firefighter, such person maintained, at the time of becoming disabled, satisfactory performance with such firefighter's fire department;

(3) If the eligible disabled person was a correctional officer, such person maintained, at the time of becoming disabled, satisfactory performance as a correctional officer; or

(4) If the eligible disabled person was a youth detention officer, such person maintained, at the time of becoming disabled, satisfactory performance as a youth detention officer.

Laws 2025, LB608, § 7.